Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-401
Public Service Commission; jurisdiction; railroad safety; enforcement.

The commission shall exercise jurisdiction over the service, facilities, and equipment of all railroad carriers in this state. This jurisdiction shall extend and apply to the general public, as well as those having business relations with the railroad carrier. Sections 75-401 to 75-430 shall not be construed as giving the commission jurisdiction or control over the relations between any railroad carrier and its employees, or its employees' order, union, or other bargaining agent, either contractual or otherwise, except as provided in sections 75-419 to 75-426.

The commission shall enforce the standards of railroad safety set forth in 49 C.F.R. parts 213, 215, 223, 229, 231, and 232.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. IV, § 1, p. 1398;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 82.

Powers of Railway Commission hereunder are not limited by statute authorizing enforcement by injunction in absence of specific legislation to that effect. Nebraska State Railway Commission v. Chicago & N.W. Ry. Co., 187 Neb. 369, 191 N.W.2d 438 (1971).